Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,100
Advisory opinions; application; effect.

Any person who is in doubt as to the propriety of action proposed to be taken by him may apply to the commission for an advisory opinion relating thereto, and the commission shall have authority to render such opinions. When an advisory opinion is issued pursuant to a complete and accurate request, such opinion shall be a complete defense to any charge of violation of sections 49-1493 to 49-14,104 as to any action taken strictly subject to the terms of such opinion.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 100.